Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-830
Applicability of local ordinances, regulations, and building codes.

A zoning, subdivision, building code, or other real estate use law, ordinance, or regulation may not prohibit the condominium form of ownership or impose any requirement upon a condominium which it would not impose upon a physically identical development under a different form of ownership. Otherwise, no provision of sections 76-825 to 76-894 invalidates or modifies any provision of any zoning, subdivision, building code, or other real estate use law, ordinance, or regulation.

Laws 1983, LB 433, § 6.